Utah statutes.
78B-13-317.   Costs and expenses.
If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against
the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the prosecutor or
attorney general and law enforcement officers under Section 78B-13-315 or
78B-13-316.
